California statutes. Penal Code
 circumstances set forth by the ordinance, be afforded an opportunity to complete an administrative process that imposes only an administrative penalty enforced in a civil proceeding. The ordinance for imposing and enforcing the administrative penalty shall be governed by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 99580) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) Enforce as an infraction pursuant to subdivision (b) the act of failing to yield seating reserved for an elderly or disabled person in a facility or vehicle for which the public transportation agency has jurisdiction, provided that the governing board of the public transportation agency enacts an ordinance to that effect after a public hearing on the issue.

(f) For purposes of this section, “facility or
 vehicle of a public transportation system” means any of the following:

(1) A facility or vehicle of a public transportation system as defined by Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) A facility of, or vehicle operated by, an entity subsidized by, the Department of Transportation.

(3) A facility or vehicle of a rail authority, whether owned or leased, including, but not limited to, any part of a railroad, or track of a railroad, or any branch or branchway, switch, turnout, bridge, viaduct, culvert, embankment, station house, or other structure or fixture, or any part thereof, attached or connected to a railroad.

(4) A leased or rented facility or vehicle for
 which any of the entities described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) incurs costs of cleanup, repair, or replacement as a result of any of those acts.

(g) A minor shall not be charged with an infraction or a misdemeanor for violation of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c). Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the ability of a public transportation agency to assess an administrative penalty as established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) and in Section 99580 of the Public Utilities Code, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) upon a first or second violation and not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) upon a third or subsequent violation, to permit the performance of community service in lieu of payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty pursuant to Section 99580 of the Public Utilities
 Code, or to allow payment of the fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty in installments or deferred payment pursuant to Section 99580 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

640.2.

(a) Any person who stamps, prints, places, or inserts any writing in or on any product or box, package, or other container containing a consumer product offered for sale is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) This section does not apply if the owner or manager of the premises where the product is stored or sold, or his or her designee, or the product manufacturer or authorized distributor or retailer of the product consents to the placing or inserting of the writing.

(c) As used in this section, “writing” means any form of representation or communication, including handbills, notices, or advertising, that contains letters, words, or pictorial representations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 12, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

640.5.

(a) (1) Any person who defaces with graffiti or other inscribed material the interior or exterior of the facilities or vehicles of a governmental entity, as defined by Section 811.2 of the Government Code, or the interior or exterior of the facilities or vehicles of a public transportation system as defined by Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code, or the interior or exterior of the facilities of or vehicles operated by entities subsidized by the Department of Transportation or the interior or exterior of any
 leased or rented facilities or vehicles for which any of the above entities incur costs of less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for cleanup, repair, or replacement is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and by a minimum of 48 hours of community service for a total time not to exceed 200 hours over a period not to exceed 180 days, during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment. This subdivision does not preclude application of Section 594.

(2) In lieu of the community service required pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 90 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this
 paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young children.

(b) (1) If the person has been convicted previously of an infraction under subdivision (a) or has a prior conviction of Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.6, or 640.7, the offense is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As a condition of probation, the court shall order the defendant to perform a minimum of 96 hours of community service not to exceed 400 hours over a period not to exceed 350 days during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(2) In lieu of the community service required pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may,
 if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, as a condition of probation, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 180 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young children.

(c) (1) Every person who, having been convicted previously under this section or Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.6, or 640.7, or any combination of these offenses, on two separate occasions, and having been incarcerated pursuant to a sentence, a conditional sentence, or a grant of probation for at least one of the convictions, is subsequently convicted under this section, shall be punished by imprisonment
 in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As a condition of probation, the court may order the defendant to perform community service not to exceed 600 hours over a period not to exceed 480 days during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(2) In lieu of the community service that may be ordered pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, as a condition of probation, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 240 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single
 parent who must care for young children.

(d) (1) Upon conviction of any person under subdivision (a), the court, in addition to any punishment imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), at the victim’s option, may order the defendant to perform the necessary labor to clean up, repair, or replace the property damaged by that person.

(2) If a minor is personally unable to pay any fine levied for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the parent or legal guardian of the minor shall be liable for payment of the fine. A court may waive payment of the fine or any part thereof by the parent or legal guardian upon a finding of good cause.

(e) Any fine levied for a violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall be credited by the county treasurer pursuant to Section 1463.29 to the governmental
 entity having jurisdiction over, or responsibility for, the facility or vehicle involved, to be used for removal of the graffiti or other inscribed material or replacement or repair of the property defaced by the graffiti or other inscribed material. Before crediting these fines to the appropriate governmental entity, the county may determine the administrative costs it has incurred pursuant to this section, and retain an amount equal to those costs.

Any community service which is required pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of a person under the age of 18 years may be performed in the presence, and under the direct supervision, of the person’s parent or legal guardian.

(f) As used in this section, the term “graffiti or other inscribed material” includes any unauthorized inscription, word, figure, mark, or design that is written, marked, etched, scratched, drawn, or painted on real or personal
 property.

(g) The court may order any person ordered to perform community service or graffiti removal pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) to undergo counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 847, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

640.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Section 640.5, any person who defaces with graffiti or other inscribed material any real or personal property not his or her own, when the amount of the defacement, damage, or destruction is less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). This subdivision does not preclude application of Section 594.

In addition to the penalty set forth in this section, the
 court shall order the defendant to perform a minimum of 48 hours of community service not to exceed 200 hours over a period not to exceed 180 days during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(2) In lieu of the community service required pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 90 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young children.

(b) (1) If the person has been convicted previously of an
 infraction under subdivision (a) or has a prior conviction of Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, or 640.7, the offense is a misdemeanor, punishable by not to exceed six months in a county jail, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As a condition of probation, the court shall order the defendant to perform a minimum of 96 hours of community service not to exceed 400 hours over a period not to exceed 350 days during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(2) In lieu of the community service required pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, as a condition of probation, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 180 days. Participation of a parent or
 guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young children.

(c) (1) Every person who, having been convicted previously under this section or Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, or 640.7, or any combination of these offenses, on two separate occasions, and having been incarcerated pursuant to a sentence, a conditional sentence, or a grant of probation for at least one of the convictions, is subsequently convicted under this section, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As a condition of probation, the court may order the defendant to perform community service not to exceed 600 hours over a period not to exceed 480 days during a time other than his or her
 hours of school attendance or employment.

(2) In lieu of the community service that may be ordered pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may, if a jurisdiction has adopted a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, order the defendant, and his or her parents or guardians if the defendant is a minor, as a condition of probation, to keep a specified property in the community free of graffiti for 240 days. Participation of a parent or guardian is not required under this paragraph if the court deems this participation to be detrimental to the defendant, or if the parent or guardian is a single parent who must care for young children.

(d) Upon conviction of any person under subdivision (a), the court, in addition to any punishment imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), at the victim’s option, may order the defendant to perform the necessary
 labor to clean up, repair, or replace the property damaged by that person.

(e) If a minor is personally unable to pay any fine levied for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the parent or legal guardian of the minor shall be liable for payment of the fine. A court may waive payment of the fine or any part thereof by the parent or legal guardian upon a finding of good cause.

Any community service which is required pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of a person under the age of 18 years may be performed in the presence, and under the direct supervision, of the person’s parent or legal guardian.

(f) As used in this section, the term “graffiti or other inscribed material” includes any unauthorized inscription, word, figure, mark, or design that is written, marked, etched, scratched, drawn, or painted on real or personal
 property.

(g) The court may order any person ordered to perform community service or graffiti removal pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) to undergo counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

640.7.

Any person who violates Section 594, 640.5, or 640.6 on or within 100 feet of a highway, or its appurtenances, including, but not limited to, guardrails, signs, traffic signals, snow poles, and similar facilities, excluding signs naming streets, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second conviction is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand
 dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 853, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

640.8.

Any person who violates Section 594, 640.5, or 640.6, on a freeway, or its appurtenances, including sound walls, overpasses, overpass supports, guardrails, signs, signals, and other traffic control devices, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As a condition of probation, the court may order the defendant to perform community service not to exceed 480 hours over a period not to exceed 420 days during a time other
 than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

640a.

1. Any person who shall knowingly and wilfully operate, or cause to be operated, or who shall attempt to operate, or attempt to cause to be operated, any automatic vending machine, slot machine or other receptacle designed to receive lawful coin of the United States of America in connection with the sale, use or enjoyment of property or service, by means of a slug or any false, counterfeited, mutilated, sweated or foreign coin, or by any means, method, trick or device whatsoever not lawfully authorized by the owner, lessee or licensee of such machine or receptacle, or who shall take, obtain or receive from or in connection with any automatic vending
 machine, slot machine or other receptacle designed to receive lawful coin of the United States of America in connection with the sale, use or enjoyment of property or service, any goods, wares, merchandise, gas, electric current, article of value, or the use or enjoyment of any musical instrument, phonograph or other property, without depositing in and surrendering to such machine or receptacle lawful coin of the United States of America to the amount required therefor by the owner, lessee or licensee of such machine or receptacle shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

2. Any person who, with intent to cheat or defraud the owner, lessee, licensee or other person entitled to the contents of any automatic vending machine, slot machine or other receptacle, depository or contrivance designed to receive lawful coin of the United States of America in connection with the sale, use or enjoyment of property or service, or who, knowing or having cause to
 believe that the same is intended for unlawful use, shall manufacture for sale, or sell or give away any slug, device or substance whatsoever intended or calculated to be placed or deposited in any such automatic vending machine, slot machine or other such receptacle, depository or contrivance, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2096.)
-------------------------------------------

640b.

1. Any person who knowingly, wilfully and with intent to defraud the owner, lessee or licensee of any coin-box telephone, shall operate or cause to be operated, attempt to operate, or attempt to cause to be operated, any coin-box telephone by means of any slug or any false, counterfeited, mutilated, sweated or foreign coin, or by any means, method, trick or device whatsoever not lawfully authorized by such owner, lessee or licensee, or any person who, knowingly, wilfully and with intent to defraud the owner, lessee or licensee of any coin-box telephone, shall take, obtain or receive from or in connection with any such coin-box telephone, the use or
 enjoyment of any telephone or telegraph facilities or service, without depositing in or surrendering to such coin-box telephone lawful coin of the United States of America to the amount required therefor by such owner, lessee or licensee, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

2. Any person who, with the intent to cheat or defraud the owner, lessee or licensee or other person entitled to the contents of any coin-box telephone, or who, knowing or having cause to believe that the same is intended for unlawful use, shall manufacture for sale, or sell or give away any slug, device or substance whatsoever intended or calculated to be placed or deposited in any such coin-box telephone, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2096.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

Every person who, by the payment or promise of any bribe, inducement, or reward, procures or attempts to procure any telegraph or telephone agent, operator, or employee to disclose any private message, or the contents, purport, substance, or meaning thereof, or offers to any agent, operator, or employee any bribe, compensation, or reward for the disclosure of any private information received by him or her by reason of his or her trust as agent, operator, or employee, or uses or attempts to use any information so obtained, is punishable as provided in Section 639.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

641.3.

(a) Any employee who solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept money or any thing of value from a person other than his or her employer, other than in trust for the employer, corruptly and without the knowledge or consent of the employer, in return for using or agreeing to use his or her position for the benefit of that other person, and any person who offers or gives an employee money or any thing of value
 under those circumstances, is guilty of commercial bribery.

(b) This section does not apply where the amount of money or monetary worth of the thing of value is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or less.

(c) Commercial bribery is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year if the amount of the bribe is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, or by imprisonment in the county jail, or in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years if the amount of the bribe exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Employee” means an officer, director, agent, trustee, partner, or employee.

(2) “Employer” means a corporation,
 association, organization, trust, partnership, or sole proprietorship.

(3) “Corruptly” means that the person specifically intends to injure or defraud (A) his or her employer, (B) the employer of the person to whom he or she offers, gives, or agrees to give the money or a thing of value, (C) the employer of the person from whom he or she requests, receives, or agrees to receive the money or a thing of value, or (D) a competitor of any such employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 35.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

641.4.

(a) An employee of a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company who corruptly violates Section 12404 of the Insurance Code by paying, directly or indirectly, a commission, compensation, or other consideration to a licensee, as defined in Section 10011 of the Business and Professions Code, or a licensee who corruptly violates Section 10177.4 of the Business and Professions Code by receiving from an employee of a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company a commission, compensation, or
 other consideration, as an inducement for the placement or referral of title business, is guilty of commercial bribery.

(b) For purposes of this section, commercial bribery is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each unlawful transaction, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(c) For purposes of this section, “title business” has the same meaning as that used in Section 12404 of the Insurance Code.

(d) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other law.

(e) This section shall not be construed to supersede or affect Section 641.3. A person may be charged with a violation of this section and Section 641.3. However, a defendant may not be punished under this
 section and Section 641.3 for the same act that constitutes a violation of both this section and Section 641.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

641.5.

(a) In any clothes cleaning establishment in which more than one gallon of a volatile, commercially moisture-free solvent of the chlorinated hydrocarbon type is used for dry cleaning, the performance of all the dry cleaning, drying, and deodorizing processes shall be completed entirely within fluid-tight machines or apparatus vented to the open air at a point not less than eight feet from any window or other opening and so used and operated as to prevent the escape of fumes, gases, or vapors into workrooms or workplaces.

(b) Except when operations are performed as provided
 in subdivision (a), no person shall operate a clothes cleaning establishment in which more than one gallon of a volatile, commercially moisture-free solvent of the chlorinated hydrocarbon type is used for dry cleaning except under either of the following conditions:

(1) All of the dry cleaning, drying, and deodorizing processes are performed in a single room or compartment designed and ventilated in such a manner that dangerous toxic concentrations of vapors will not accumulate in working areas. 

(2) The dry cleaning processes are performed in fluid-tight machines or apparatus designed, installed, and operated in a manner that will prevent the escape of dangerous toxic concentrations of vapors to the working areas.

(c) “Volatile, commercially moisture-free solvent” means either of the following:

(1) Any commercially moisture-free liquid, volatile product or substance having the capacity to evaporate and, during evaporation, to generate and emit a gas or vapor.

(2) Any solvent commonly known to the clothes cleaning industry as a “chlorinated hydrocarbon solvent.”

(d) Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 478, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

641.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person engaged in the business of dry cleaning shall use carbon tetrachloride or trichlorethylene as a cleaning agent when engaged in onsite dry cleaning. For purposes of this section, “onsite dry cleaning” means dry cleaning which is performed in a residence or any commercial or public building other than a clothes cleaning establishment or plant. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 478, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

Every person who wilfully and maliciously removes and keeps possession of and appropriates for his own use articles of value from a dead human body, the theft of which articles would be petty theft is guilty of a misdemeanor, or if the theft of the articles would be grand theft, a felony. This section shall not apply to articles removed at the request or direction of one of the persons enumerated in section 7111 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 691.)
-------------------------------------------

643.

No person knowingly shall dispose of fetal remains in a public or private dump, refuse, or disposal site or place open to public view. For the purposes of this section, “fetal remains” means the lifeless product of conception regardless of the duration of the pregnancy.

Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 377.)
-------------------------------------------

645.

(a) Any person guilty of a first conviction of any offense specified in subdivision (c), where the victim has not attained 13 years of age, may, upon parole, undergo medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment or its chemical equivalent, in addition to any other punishment prescribed for that offense or any other provision of law, at the discretion of the court.

(b) Any person guilty of a second conviction of any offense specified in subdivision (c), where the victim has not attained 13 years of age, shall, upon parole, undergo medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment or its chemical equivalent, in addition to any other punishment prescribed for that offense
 or any other provision of law.

(c) This section shall apply to the following offenses:

(1) Subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 286.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 288.

(3) Subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a.

(4) Subdivision (a) or (j) of Section 289.

(d) The parolee shall begin medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment one week prior to his or her release from confinement in the state prison or other institution and shall continue treatments until the Department of Corrections demonstrates to the
 Board of Prison Terms that this treatment is no longer necessary.

(e) If a person voluntarily undergoes a permanent, surgical alternative to hormonal chemical treatment for sex offenders, he or she shall not be subject to this section.

(f) The Department of Corrections shall administer this section and implement the protocols required by this section. Nothing in the protocols shall require an employee of the Department of Corrections who is a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or the Osteopathic Initiative Act to participate against his or her will in the administration of the provisions of this section. These protocols shall include, but not be limited to, a requirement to inform
 the person about the effect of hormonal chemical treatment and any side effects that may result from it. A person subject to this section shall acknowledge the receipt of this information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 62.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

646.

It is unlawful for any person with the intent, or for the purpose of instituting a suit thereon outside of this state, to seek or solicit the business of collecting any claim for damages for personal injury sustained within this state, or for death resulting therefrom, with the intention of instituting suit thereon outside of this state, in cases where such right of action rests in a resident of this state, or his legal representative, and is against a person, copartnership, or corporation subject to personal service within this state.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this
 section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail not less than 30 days nor more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment at the discretion of the court but within said limits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 314.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

646.5.

No person shall knowingly and directly solicit employment from any injured person or from any other person to obtain authorization on behalf of the injured person, as an investigator to investigate the accident or act which resulted in injury or death to such person or damage to the property of such person. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the soliciting of employment as an investigator from such injured person’s attorney.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

This section shall not apply to any business agent or attorney employed by a labor
 organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

646.6.

No person shall knowingly and directly solicit any injured person, or anyone acting on behalf of any injured person, for the sale or use of photographs relating to the accident which resulted in the injury or death of such injured person.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person, other than a public employee acting within the scope of his or her employment, from soliciting the injured person’s attorney for the sale or use of such photographs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

646.9.

(a) Any person who willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly follows or willfully and maliciously harasses another person and who makes a credible threat with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear for their safety, or the safety of their immediate family, is guilty of the crime of stalking, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment,
 or by imprisonment in the state prison.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) when there is a temporary restraining order, injunction, or any other court order in effect prohibiting the behavior described in subdivision (a) against the same party, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years.

(c) (1) Every person who, after having been convicted of a felony under Section 273.5, 273.6, or 422, commits a violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or five years.

(2) Every person who, after having been convicted of a felony under subdivision (a), commits a violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or five years.

(d) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, the sentencing court may order a person convicted of a felony under this section to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290.006.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “harass” means engages in a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person that seriously alarms, annoys, torments, or terrorizes the person, and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “course of conduct” means two
 or more acts occurring over a period of time, however short, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

(g) For the purposes of this section, “credible threat” means a verbal or written threat, including a threat performed through the use of an electronic communication device, or a threat implied by a pattern of conduct or a combination of verbal, written, or electronically communicated statements and conduct, including threats to a person’s pet, service animal, emotional support animal, or horse, made
 with the intent to place the person that is the target of the threat in reasonable fear for their safety, or the safety of their family, and made with the apparent ability to carry out the threat so as to cause the person who is the target of the threat to reasonably fear for their safety or the safety of their family. It is not necessary to prove that the defendant had the intent to actually carry out the threat. The present incarceration of a person making the threat shall not
 be a bar to prosecution under this section. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “credible threat.”

(h) For purposes of this section, the term “electronic communication device” includes, but is not limited to, telephones, cellular phones, computers, video recorders, fax machines, or pagers. “Electronic communication” has the same meaning as the term defined in Subsection 12 of Section 2510 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(i) This section shall not apply to conduct that occurs during labor picketing.

(j) If probation is granted, or the execution or imposition of a sentence is suspended, for any person convicted under this section, it shall be a condition
 of probation that the person participate in counseling, as designated by the court. However, the court, upon a showing of good cause, may find that the counseling requirement shall not be imposed.

(k) (1) The sentencing court also shall consider issuing an order restraining the defendant from any contact with the victim, that may be valid for up to 10 years, as determined by the court. It is the intent of the Legislature that the length of any restraining order be based upon the seriousness of the facts before the court, the probability of future violations, the safety of the victim and their immediate family, and the information provided to the court pursuant to Section 273.75.

(2) This protective order may be issued by the court whether the defendant
 is sentenced to state prison, county jail, or if imposition of sentence is suspended and the defendant is placed on probation.

(l) For purposes of this section, “immediate family” means any spouse, parent, child, any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the second degree, or any other person who regularly resides in the household, or who, within the prior six months, regularly resided in the household.

(m) The court shall consider whether the defendant would benefit from treatment pursuant to Section 2684. If it is determined to be appropriate, the court shall recommend that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation make a certification as provided in Section 2684. Upon the certification, the defendant shall be evaluated and transferred to the appropriate hospital
 for treatment pursuant to Section 2684.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.   (SB 221)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

646.91.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a judicial officer may issue an ex parte emergency protective order if a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1, 830.2, 830.32, or subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, asserts reasonable grounds to believe that a person is in immediate and present danger of stalking based upon the person’s allegation that he or she has been willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly followed or harassed by another person who has made a credible threat with the intent of placing the person who is the target of the threat in reasonable fear for his or her safety, or the safety of his or her immediate family, within the meaning of Section 646.9.

(b) A peace officer who requests an emergency protective order
 shall reduce the order to writing and sign it.

(c) An emergency protective order shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of the grounds asserted for the order.

(2) The date and time the order expires.

(3) The address of the superior court for the district or county in which the protected party resides.

(4) The following statements, which shall be printed in English and Spanish:

(A) “To the protected person: This order will last until the date and time noted above. If you wish to seek continuing protection, you will have to apply for an order from the court at the address noted above. You may seek the advice of an
 attorney as to any matter connected with your application for any future court orders. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you in making your application.”

(B) “To the restrained person: This order will last until the date and time noted above. The protected party may, however, obtain a more permanent restraining order from the court. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the application. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you in responding to the application. You may not own, possess, purchase, or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, a firearm while this order is in effect.”

(d) An emergency protective order may be issued under this section only if the judicial officer finds both of the following:

(1) That reasonable grounds have been asserted to believe that an immediate and present danger of stalking, as defined in Section 646.9, exists.
